en: whole milk, full cream milk
bg: пълномаслено мляко
bs: punomasno mleko
ca: llet sencera
cs: plnotučné mléko
da: sødmælk, sødmaelk
de: Vollmilch
es: leche entera
fi: täysmaito
fr: lait entier
hr: mlijeko trajno, punomasno mlijeko
hu: teljes tej
is: nýmjólk
it: latte intero
ja: 全乳
lt: nenugriebtas pienas
lv: pilnpiens
nb: helmelk
nl: volle melk
pl: mleko pełne, pełne mleko
pt: leite enteiro, leite integral
ro: lapte integral
sv: Helmjölk, sötmjölk
zh: 全脂牛奶

en: UHT pasteurised whole milk
bg: UHT пастьоризирано пълномаслено мляко
ca: llet sencera esterilitzada UHT, llet esterilitzada UHT sencera
de: Haltbare Vollmilch, H-Vollmilch
es: leche entera esterilizada UHT, leche esterilizada UHT entera, leche UHT entera
fi: iskukuumennettu täysmaito
fr: lait entier stérilisé uht, lait entier stérilisé u h t, lait stérilisé uht entier, Lait pasteurisé entier pasteurisation haute
hr: uht pasterizirano punomasno mlijeko
hu: pasztőrözött UHT teljes tej
it: Latte intero pastorizzato UHT
nl: UHT gesteriliseerde volle melk
pl: mleko pełne UHT

en: pasteurised whole milk, pasteurized whole milk
bg: пастьоризирано пълномаслено мляко
ca: llet sencera pasteuritzada, llet pasteuritzada senceea
de: pasteurisierte Vollmilch
es: leche entera pasteurizada, leche pasteurizada entera
fi: pastöroitu täysmaito
fr: lait entier pasteurisé
hr: pasterizirano punomasno mlijeko
hu: pasztőrözött teljes tej
it: latte intero pastorizzato
lt: pasterizuotas nenugriebtas pienas
nl: volle gepasteuriseerde melk
pl: mleko pełne pasteryzowane
pt: Leite pasteurizado gordo
ro: lapte integral pasteurizat

en: cow's milk, cows' milk, cow milk
bg: краве мляко
ca: llet de vaca, llect de vaca
da: komælk
de: Kuhmilch
es: leche de vaca, nata de vaca
fi: lehmänmaito, lehmän maito
fr: lait de vache
hr: kravlje mlijeko
hu: tehéntej
it: latte di mucca, latte vaccino
ja: 牛乳
nb: kumelk
nl: koemelk
pl: Krowie mleko, mleko krowie
pt: leite de vaca
ro: lapte de vacă, lapte de vaca
ru: коровье молоко
sv: Komjölk
th: น้ำนมโค
tr: inek sütü
uk: Коров'яче молоко
zh: 牛奶

en: goat milk, goat's milk, goats milk, goats' milk
bg: козе мляко
ca: llet de cabra
cs: kozí mléko
da: gedemælk
de: Ziegenmilch
el: κατσικίσιο γάλα
eo: kaprina lakto
es: leche de cabra
et: kitsepiim
eu: ahuntz esne
fi: vuohenmaito
fr: lait de chèvre
he: חלב עיזים
hr: kozje mlijeko
hu: kecsketej
hy: այծի կաթ
id: susu kambing
it: latte di capra, latte caprino
ja: ヤギ乳
kk: ешкі сүті
ko: 염소젖
lt: ožkos pienas
mk: козјо млеко
nb: geitemelk
nl: geitenmelk
pl: kozie mleko, mleko kozie, mleka koziego
pt: leite de cabra
ro: lapte de capră, lapte de capra
ru: козье молоко
sk: kozie mlieko
sr: козје млеко
sv: getmjölk
tr: keçi sütü
vi: sữa dê

en: whole goat milk, whole goat milk, raw goat milk
bg: пълномаслено козе мляко
ca: llet sencera de cabra, llet de cabra sencera, llet crua de cabra, llet de cabra crua
de: Ziegenvollmilch, Ziegen-Vollmilch, Ziegen-Rohmilch, Ziegenrohmilch, unpasteurisierte Ziegenmilch
es: leche entera de cabra, leche de cabra entera, leche cruda de cabra, leche de cabra cruda
fi: vuohen täysmaito, vuohen raakamaito, raaka vuohenmaito
fr: lait entier de chèvre, lait cru de chèvre, lait de chèvre cru
hr: punomasno kozje mlijeko
hu: teljes kecsketej, nyers kecsketej
it: latte intero di capra
nl: volle geitemelk

en: goat's milk yogurt
bg: кисело мляко от козе мляко
fr: Yaourt au lait de chèvre
hr: jogurt od kozjeg mlijeka

en: plain goat's milk yogurt with around 5% fat
fr: Yaourt au lait de chèvre nature 5% MG environ
hr: obični jogurt od kozjeg mlijeka s oko 5% masti

en: semi-skimmed goat milk
bg: полуобезмаслено козе мляко
ca: llet de cabra parcialment desnatada, llet de cabra semidestada, llet parcialment desnatada de cabra, llet semidesnatada de cabra
de: teilentrahmte Ziegenmilch
es: leche de cabra parcialmente desnatada, leche de cabra semidesnatada, leche parcialmente desnatada de cabra, leche semidesnatada de cabra
fi: vuohen kevytmaito
fr: lait de chevre demi-écrémé
hr: poluobrano kozje mlijeko
hu: zsírszegény kecsketej

en: skimmed goat milk, skimmed goat milk
bg: обезмаслено козе мляко
ca: llet de cabra descremada, llet de cabra desnatada, llet desnatada de cabra, llet descremada de cabra
de: entrahmte Ziegenmilch
es: leche de cabra descremada, leche de cabra desnatada, leche desnatada de cabra, leche descremada de cabra
fi: rasvaton vuohenmaito
fr: lait de chevre écrémé
hr: obrano kozje mlijeko
hu: sovány kecsketej
it: latte di capra scremato

en: pasteurised goat milk, pasteurized goat milk, pasteurised goatmilk
bg: пастьоризирано козе мляко
ca: llet de cabra pasteuritzada, llet pasteuritzada de cabra
de: pasteurisierte Ziegenmilch
es: leche de cabra pasteurizada, leche pasteurizada de cabra
fi: pastöroitu vuohenmaito
fr: lait de chèvre pasteurisé, lait pasteurisé de chèvre
hr: pasterizirano kozje mlijeko
hu: pasztőrözött kecsketej
it: latte di capra pastorizzato
nl: gepasteuriseerde geitenmelk
ro: lapte de capră pasteurizat, lapte de capra pasteurizat

en: whole goat milk UHT
bg: пълномаслено козе мляко УХТ
ca: llet sencer de cabra UHT
de: Ziegenvollmilch UHT
es: leche entera de cabra UHT
fi: vuohen täysmaito UHT
fr: Lait de chèvre entier UHT
hr: punomasno kozje mlijeko uht
hu: teljes kecsketej UHT
it: latte intero di capra UHT
nl: volle geitenmelk UHT

en: semi-skimmed pasteurized goat milk UHT
bg: полуобезмаслено пастьоризирано козе мляко УХТ
ca: llet de cabra semidesnatada pasteuritzada UHT
de: teilentrahmte pasteurisierte Ziegenmilch UHT
es: leche de cabra semidesnatada pasteurizada UHT
fi: kevyesti pastöroitu puolirasvainen vuohenmaito UHT
fr: lait de chèvre demi-écrémé UHT
hr: poluobrano pasterizirano kozje mlijeko uht
hu: zsírszegény pasztőrözött kecsketej UHT
nl: halfvolle gepasteuriseerde geitenmelk UHT

en: sheeps milk, sheep milk, ewes milk, ewe's milk, sheep's milk
ar: حليب الغنم
bg: овче мляко
ca: llet d'ovella
cs: ovči mléko
da: Fåremælk
de: Schafsmilch, Schafmilch
el: πρόβειο γάλα
eo: ŝafina lakto
es: leche de oveja
et: lambapiim
fa: شیر گوسفند
fi: lampaanmaito
fr: lait de brebis
he: חלב כבש
hr: ovčje mlijeko
hu: juhtej, birkatej
hy: ոչխարի կաթ
id: Susu domba
it: latte di pecora
ja: 羊乳
ka: ცხვრის რძე
kk: қой сүті
ko: 양젖
lt: avies pienas
nb: sauemelk
nl: schapenmelk
nn: sauemjølk
pl: mleko owcze
pt: leite de ovelha
ro: lapte de oaie
ru: овечье молоко
sr: овчије млеко
sv: fårmjölk
tr: koyun sütü
tt: сарык сөте

en: Sheeps or goat milk
bg: овче или козе мляко
de: Schaf- oder Ziegenmilch
es: leche de oveja o de cabra
fr: lait de brebis ou de chèvre
hr: ovčje ili kozje mlijeko
it: latte di pecora o di capra
jv: susu wedhus
nl: schapen- of geitenmelk

en: whole sheep milk
bg: пълномаслено овче мляко
ca: llet sencera d'ovella, llet d'ovella sencera
es: leche entera de oveja, leche de oveja entera
fr: lait entier de brebis, Lait de brebis entier
hr: punomasno ovčje mlijeko
it: latte intero di pecora
nl: volle schapenmelk

en: skimmed sheeps milk, skimmed sheep milk, semi-skimmed sheeps milk
ar: حليب الغنم قليل الدسم
bg: частично обезмаслено овче мляко
ca: llet d'ovella desnatada, llet d'ovella descremada
de: fettarme Schafmilch, fettreduzierte Schafmilch
es: leche de oveja desnatada, leche de oveja semidesnatada
fi: rasvaton lampaanmaito, vähärasvainen lampaanmaito
fr: lait de brebis partiellement écrémé
hr: obrano ovčje mlijeko
hu: zsírszegény juhtej
it: latte di pecora scremato
nl: mager schapenmelk

fr: lait de brebis thermisé
ca: llet d'ovella termitzada, llet termitzada d'ovella
es: leche de oveja termizada, leche termizada de oveja
it: latte di pecora termizzato
nl: thermische schapenmelk

en: sheep and goat milk, goat and sheep milk
bg: овче и козе мляко, козе и овче мляко
de: Schafs- und Ziegenmilch
fi: vuohen ja lampaan maito, lampaan ja vuohen maito
fr: lait de brebis et de chèvre
hr: ovčje i kozje mlijeko
it: latte di pecora e capra

en: buffalo milk, buffalo's milk
bg: биволско мляко
ca: llet de búfala
de: Büffelmilch
es: leche de búfala
fi: puhvelinmaito
fr: lait de buffle, lait de bufflonne
hr: bivolje mlijeko
hu: bivalytej
it: Latte bufalino, latte di bufala
nl: buffelmelk
ru: буйволиное молоко
si: මීකිරි
sr: бивоље млеко
uk: буйволине молоко